Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 1 Allocation of Territorial Rights to Electric Suppliers

46-3-1.
Short title.

This part shall be known as the “Georgia Territorial Electric Service Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 200, § 1.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 317 (1991).

For annual survey of local government law, see 44 Mercer L. Rev. 309 (1992).

For annual survey of construction law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2004).

46-3-2.
Legislative findings and declaration of policy.

The public interest requires, and it is declared to be the policy of the State of Georgia, that, in order (1) to assure the most efficient, economical, and orderly rendering of retail electric service within the state, (2) to inhibit duplication of the lines of electric suppliers, (3) to foster the extension and location of electric supplier lines in the manner most compatible with the preservation and enhancement of the state’s physical environment, and (4) to protect and conserve lines lawfully constructed by electric suppliers, it is necessary and appropriate that the state establish and implement a plan whereby every geographic area within the state shall be either assigned to an electric supplier or declared unassigned as to any electric supplier; that, to accomplish such a plan, it is necessary that all electric suppliers within the state be subject to this part; that the commission be delegated power, authority, and jurisdiction with respect to such plan; and that all electric membership corporations and all municipalities which furnish retail electric service be additionally subject to regulation by the commission in the same manner as provided for regulation of electric light and power companies, except as to the fixing of their rates, charges, and service rules and regulations, it being determined by the General Assembly that such electric membership corporations and municipalities, which by their corporate nature are wholly or substantially controlled by their consumers, should for regulatory purposes be classified differently in certain respects from electric light and power companies.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 200, § 2.

46-3-3.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Assigned area” means an enclosed geographic area assigned to only one electric supplier by the commission or by this part, and inside which the assignee electric supplier shall have the exclusive right to extend and continue furnishing service to new premises, except as otherwise provided in this part.

“Electric membership corporation” has the meaning provided by paragraph (3) of Code Section 46-3-171.

“Electric supplier” means any electric light and power company subject to regulation by the commission, any electric membership corporation furnishing retail service in this state, and any municipality which furnishes such service within this state.

“Line” means any conductor for the distribution or transmission of electricity other than a conductor operating at a potential of 120,000 volts or more. However, a conductor that initially constitutes a line shall not cease being a line if, after March 29, 1973, it is operating at a potential in excess of 120,000 volts.

“Municipality” means:

Any geographically defined political subdivision of this state, other than a county, performing or authorized to perform multiple and substantial municipal functions, specifically including either the function of furnishing retail electric service or the function of granting to electric suppliers street franchise rights for use in furnishing retail electric service;

Any geographically defined political subdivision, or agency thereof, of this state if at any relevant time it lawfully furnishes retail electric service; and

Any political subdivision of any other state which furnishes retail electric service within this state.

“Premises” means the building, structure, or facility to which electricity is being or is to be furnished, provided that two or more buildings, structures, or facilities which are located on one tract or contiguous tracts of land and are utilized by one electric consumer shall together constitute one premises; provided, however, that any such building, structure, or facility shall not, together with any other building, structure, or facility, constitute one premises if the permanent service to it is separately metered and the charges for such service are calculated independently of charges for service to any other building, structure, or facility; provided, further, that an outdoor security light, or an outdoor sign requiring less than 2200 watts, shall not constitute a premises.

“Primary supplier” within a municipality in existence on March 29, 1973, means, either:

That electric supplier which, on March 29, 1973, is furnishing service to the majority or to a plurality, whichever is the case, of the retail electric meters then inside the corporate limits of the municipality; or

That electric supplier to which the commission has reassigned a geographic area, previously assigned to another electric supplier, located within such municipality as its limits existed on March 29, 1973.

“Secondary supplier” within a municipality in existence on March 29, 1973, means any electric supplier which owns lines on that date within such municipality and which is not a primary supplier.

“Service” means retail electric service and includes temporary or construction service as well as permanent service but excludes wholesale service and sales for resale.

“To own” or “to belong” or the like means, wherever used in reference to lines being used by an electric supplier, to have any proprietary or possessory interest.

“Unassigned area-A” means a geographic area which, between March 29, 1973, and Sept. 1, 1975, was not an assigned area and was not declared to be an unassigned area-B.

“Unassigned area-B” means a geographic area which has not been assigned and which has been declared by the commission to be, or by operation of this part becomes, an unassigned area-B, and inside which an electric supplier shall have the right to extend and thereafter continue furnishing service to new premises locating therein if chosen by the consumer utilizing such premises, provided that an electric supplier whose line, as it exists on March 29, 1973, or as thereafter lawfully constructed to serve new premises pursuant to this part, is at least partially within 500 feet of such new premises shall have the exclusive right to extend and continue furnishing service to such premises if the line of every other electric supplier so existing or so thereafter constructed is at that time wholly more than 500 feet from such premises.

“Wholly new municipality” means a municipality initially coming into existence after March 29, 1973, but not one resulting from the reincorporation of all or any portion of a geographic area theretofore contained in a previously existing municipality or from the merger, consolidation, or any other combination of two or more political subdivisions which are counties or incorporated cities.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 200, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 46/SB 465.

The 2006 amendment,

effective April 14, 2006, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (2) for the former provisions, which read: “ ‘Electric membership corporation’ means a corporation organized under Article 2 of this chapter.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Administrative Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 81 (2001).

46-3-4.
Assignment or declaration as unassigned areas-B of geographic areas outside municipal limits as of March 29, 1973.

After March 29, 1973, and continuing thereafter as rapidly as it is administratively practicable to do so, the commission is authorized and directed to assign to electric suppliers or to declare as unassigned areas-B all geographic areas in this state that were, on March 29, 1973, located outside the corporate limits of any municipality. Such assignments and declarations of unassignment shall be effected by the commission in accordance with the following standards:

Assigned areas shall be described by defined boundaries on maps to be filed with the commission and incorporated by it in its orders. Where deemed necessary or appropriate, the commission may require boundaries to be additionally described by written metes and bounds;

Each geographic area assigned shall be assigned to only one electric supplier, as determined by public convenience and necessity, having primary regard for the location of electric suppliers’ lines but having no regard for differences in electric suppliers’ retail rates or for the fact that retail consumers are not then being served from such lines;

Each geographic area assigned shall be so assigned that its boundaries enclose land spaces in which the assignee electric supplier owns all or a preponderance of the lines, provided that a geographic area may be so assigned or declared unassigned even though it is completely surrounded by the inner boundaries of another geographic area assigned to an electric supplier. Boundaries will be located around the perimeter of such land spaces so as to be approximately 1,000 feet from the nearest of the assignee electric supplier’s lines so enclosed, provided that if the lines of two or more electric suppliers are closer together than 2,000 feet, the boundary shall be located approximately halfway between them; provided, however, that where compelling factors of public convenience and necessity so require, including the need for using natural and manmade landmarks for boundary references, the location of a boundary may vary somewhat more or somewhat less than such 1,000 foot or halfway distance; provided, further, that such 1,000 foot or halfway distance standards shall not apply to any lines of the assignee electric supplier which extend from inside the assigned area outside such area or to any lines of any other electric supplier which extend from outside the area inside or completely across such area and which do not otherwise occasion assignment or unassignment of land space, the rights and restrictions applying to such other electric supplier’s lines inside such area being as provided for in paragraph (4) of this Code section;

A line of an electric supplier which extends into or completely crosses a land space in which another electric supplier owns a preponderance of the lines may nevertheless be considered as the basis for assigning or declaring unassigned land space related thereto; but, unless such line so occasions an assignment or an unassignment, then, from and after the date of the assignment to an electric supplier of the geographic area within which such line is enclosed and based upon the location of both suppliers’ lines on that date, the electric supplier owning such enclosed line shall have the exclusive right to extend and continue furnishing service to all new premises locating at least partially within 500 feet of such line and wholly more than 500 feet from the assignee electric supplier’s lines and shall have the right, if chosen by the consumer utilizing such premises, to extend and continue furnishing service to new premises locating at least partially within 500 feet of both electric suppliers’ lines but shall not otherwise have the right, unless so agreed by the assignee electric supplier and the consumer utilizing such premises, to extend and furnish service to any other premises locating inside such assigned area;

Except where public convenience and necessity require their assignment, the commission shall declare as unassigned areas-B those land spaces which are not assigned to an electric supplier pursuant to any other provision of this part; and

Not inconsistent with Code Section 46-3-8, any electric supplier may apply to the commission for assignment to it of one or more geographic areas or for the commission to declare one or more geographic areas to be unassigned areas-B.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 200, § 4.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law on administrative law, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2010).

For article, “The Chevron Two-Step in Georgia’s Administrative Law,” see 46 Ga. L. Rev. 871 (2012).

46-3-5.
Assignment of geographic areas within municipal limits as of March 29, 1973.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-8, all geographic areas inside the corporate limits of every municipality, as such limits existed on March 29, 1973, are assigned to the primary supplier, subject to the rights and restrictions applying to electric suppliers owning lines therein, as follows: Based upon the location of all electric suppliers’ lines therein on March 29, 1973, every secondary supplier shall have the exclusive right to extend and continue furnishing service to new premises locating therein at least partially within 300 feet of its line and wholly more than 300 feet from the lines of every other electric supplier; and shall have the right, if chosen by the consumer utilizing such premises, to extend and continue furnishing service to new premises locating therein at least partially within 300 feet of both its lines and the lines of any other electric supplier; but shall not otherwise have the right, unless so agreed by the primary supplier and by any other secondary supplier whose lines are located at least partially within 300 feet thereof and the consumer utilizing such premises, to extend and continue furnishing service to any other premises locating therein, which shall be the exclusive right of the primary supplier or such other secondary supplier, if such be the case.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 200, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

46-3-6.
Assignment and unassignment of geographic areas included within wholly new municipalities after March 29, 1973.

As to geographic areas which, after March 29, 1973, are included within the initial limits of a wholly new municipality, the rights and restrictions applying to electric suppliers shall be as follows:

Any portion of such geographic area then already assigned to an electric supplier shall continue to be so assigned until and unless reassigned by the commission to another electric supplier pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Code Section 46-3-8; and

Any portion of such geographic area which is then unassigned shall continue to be so unassigned until and unless it is assigned by the commission, taking into account the recommendation, if any, of the municipality itself, to an electric supplier pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Code Section 46-3-8.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 200, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

46-3-7.
Assignment and unassignment of geographic areas annexed to municipalities after March 29, 1973.

Whenever, after March 29, 1973, any geographic area is annexed to a municipality including the inclusion of a geographic area in a new municipality formed by the merger, consolidation, or any other combination of a then existing municipality and one or more other geographically defined political subdivisions, if the resulting political subdivision constitutes a municipality as defined in Code Section 46-3-3, such geographic area shall be assigned or assignable or become unassigned, and the rights and restrictions applying to electric suppliers therein shall be as follows:

In so much of such geographic area, if any, as was immediately theretofore within the limits of a municipality as they existed on March 29, 1973, or as they existed on the date on which a wholly new municipality came into existence, and if such annexation is caused by the merger, consolidation, or any other combination of such previously existing municipality and one or more other geographically defined political subdivisions, resulting in a political subdivision which constitutes a municipality as defined in Code Section 46-3-3, the rights and restrictions applying to all electric suppliers therein shall continue to be governed by Code Section 46-3-5 or 46-3-6, whichever is applicable;

As to such geographic areas other than those provided for in paragraph (1) of this Code section:

So much of such geographic area, if any, as was already assigned to a primary supplier within a municipality which was in existence on March 29, 1973, shall continue to be so assigned, provided that if such annexation is caused by the merger, consolidation, or any other combination of two or more such municipalities having different primary suppliers, such assignments shall continue in favor of such primary suppliers respectively;

If the annexation is to a wholly new municipality, then so much of such geographic area, if any, as was already assigned to an electric supplier then serving as an assignee electric supplier within such municipality shall continue to be so assigned;

If such annexation includes one or more wholly new municipalities or one or more municipalities which were in existence on March 29, 1973, then so much of such geographic area, if any, as was then contiguous to a wholly new municipality and was already assigned to an assignee electric supplier within such wholly new municipality, or which was contiguous to a municipality which was in existence on March 29, 1973, and was already assigned to the primary supplier within such municipality, shall continue to be so assigned;

As to such geographic areas which are annexed by other than merger, consolidation, or other combination of a previously existing municipality and one or more other geographically defined political subdivisions so as to result in a political subdivision which constitutes a municipality as defined in Code Section 46-3-3 but are not provided for in paragraph (1) of this Code section or in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of this paragraph, so much of such geographic area, if any, as was already assigned to any electric supplier shall continue to be so assigned. In the event the primary supplier delivers, not less than 45 nor more than 90 days prior to the effective date of such annexation, written notice of such annexation upon every other electric supplier owning lines within the county or counties in which the annexing municipality is located (or, though not in the same county, within one mile of any portion of such geographic area), such portions of such geographic area as shall not have been already assigned to any other electric supplier shall by operation of this part become assigned to the primary supplier unless, on or before the effective date of such annexation, there is filed with the commission one or more applications by one or more other electric suppliers for the assignment of any portion of such geographic area. If such an application or applications are filed, then, until there is a final determination with respect to such application or applications, the service rights and restrictions applying to electric suppliers in so much of such geographic area as is the subject matter of the application or applications shall continue as they were immediately prior to the effective date of annexation. In such a proceeding, the commission, acting in accordance with Code Section 46-3-4, may make assignments of all or any portion of such geographic area to one or more applicant electric suppliers. Any portion of such geographic area not so assigned to any other electric supplier shall, effective as of the final determination of such application or applications, be assigned by operation of this part to the primary supplier, provided that if the commission finds and determines upon complaint that such assignment to the primary supplier of any such portion thereof will be grossly inimical to the public interest, it shall designate such portion as an unassigned area-B. In any geographic area assigned by operation of this part pursuant to this subparagraph, every secondary supplier shall have, based upon the location of all secondary suppliers’ lines therein on the effective date of the annexation, the exclusive right to extend and continue furnishing service to new premises locating therein at least partially within 300 feet of its line and wholly more than 300 feet from the lines of every other electric supplier; and shall have the right, if chosen by the consumer utilizing such premises, to extend and continue furnishing service to new premises locating therein at least partially within 300 feet of both its lines and the lines of any other electric supplier; but shall not otherwise have the right, unless so agreed by the assignee electric supplier and by any other secondary supplier whose lines are located at least partially within 300 feet thereof and the consumer utilizing such premises, to extend and continue furnishing service to any other premises locating therein, which shall be the exclusive right of the assignee electric supplier or such other secondary supplier, if such be the case; or

If such geographic area was already an unassigned area-A or an unassigned area-B and was annexed by merger, consolidation or other combination of a previously existing municipality and one or more other geographically defined political subdivisions so as to result in a political subdivision which constitutes a municipality as defined in Code Section 46-3-3, or if such an unassigned area-A or unassigned area-B was otherwise annexed but the notice of annexation required by subparagraph (D) of this paragraph was not given, such geographic area shall, on the effective date of the annexation, become or continue to be, as the case may be, an unassigned area-B until and unless the commission assigns all or any portion thereof to an electric supplier pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Code Section 46-3-8.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 200, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

Cross references.

Annexation of territory by municipalities generally, Ch. 36, T. 36.

46-3-8.
Exceptions, grandfather rights, and other rights.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, but subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, after March 29, 1973, service to one or more new premises (but if more than one, such premises must be located on the same tract or on contiguous tracts of land), if utilized by one consumer and having single-metered service and a connected load which, at the time of initial full operation of the premises, is 900 kilowatts or greater (excluding redundant equipment), may be extended and furnished, if chosen by the consumer:

By the primary supplier within a municipality if the premises are located anywhere within the limits of such municipality as they existed on March 29, 1973;

By a secondary supplier within the limits of a municipality as they existed on March 29, 1973, if the premises are located at least partially within 300 feet of the lines of such secondary supplier;

By any electric supplier if the premises are located within the initial corporate limits of a wholly new municipality;

By any electric supplier owning lines in a municipality if the premises are located in a geographic area annexed in any manner to such municipality after March 29, 1973; and

By any electric supplier if the premises are located outside the limits of a municipality.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, but subject to subsections (c) and (h) of this Code section, every electric supplier shall have the exclusive right to continue serving any premises lawfully served by it on March 29, 1973, or thereafter lawfully served by it pursuant to this part, including any premises last and previously served by it which before or after March 29, 1973, have become disconnected from service for any reason, and including premises which before or after March 29, 1973, have been destroyed or dismantled and which are reconstructed after March 29, 1973, in substantial kind on approximately the same site.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part:

Upon its own complaint or the complaint of any other electric supplier or any other interested party, the commission shall have the authority and jurisdiction, after notice to all affected electric suppliers and after hearing, if a hearing is requested by any affected electric supplier or any other interested party, to find and determine that the service of an electric supplier then serving a premises or exclusively entitled under this part to serve such premises is not adequate or dependable or that such electric supplier’s rates, charges, service rules and regulations, or the application thereof unreasonably discriminate in favor of or against the consumer utilizing such premises, or that an electric supplier is in violation of subsection (b) of Code Section 46-3-11. Upon such determination, the commission shall have the authority and jurisdiction to order such electric supplier within a reasonable time to make such improvements as will make its service adequate and dependable, or to order such electric supplier within not less than 30 days to cease employing such discriminatory rates, charges, service rules and regulations, or the application thereof or the practices prohibited by subsection (b) of Code Section 46-3-11 and to substitute in lieu thereof, subject to approval by the commission, rates, charges, service rules and regulations, and practices of application thereof which are not unreasonably discriminatory, or practices in conformity with subsection (b) of Code Section 46-3-11. If the commission finds and determines in its first consideration of the matter that such electric supplier is unwilling or unable within a reasonable time to make its service adequate and dependable, or is unwilling within 30 days to cease and correct such unreasonable discrimination or practices, or if it finds in a subsequent consideration of the matter that its order to improve service, its order to cease and correct the unreasonable discrimination, or its order to cease and correct such practices has not been timely and in good faith complied with, it may then order such electric supplier to cease or desist from serving such premises and order any other electric supplier which may reasonably do so to extend and furnish service to such premises; and

Upon the joint application of the affected electric suppliers, the commission shall have the authority and jurisdiction, after notice to all affected persons and after hearing, if a hearing is requested, to find and determine that the public convenience and necessity require, and thereupon to approve, the transfer of service from one electric supplier to another electric supplier.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, but subject to subsection (b) of this Code section, the commission may:

If it determines that an assignee electric supplier has breached the tenets of public convenience and necessity therein, reassign all or any portion of an area assigned to that assignee electric supplier to another electric supplier; and

If it determines that public convenience and necessity so require, assign to any electric supplier all or any portion of a geographic area which theretofore has been an unassigned area-A or an unassigned area-B.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part:

No portion of a line constructed after March 29, 1973, by an electric supplier inside another electric supplier’s assigned area, inside an unassigned area-A, or inside a municipality to serve premises which, but for the exception provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, it would not have had the right to serve shall acquire any other service rights therein or impair or diminish any service rights of an assignee electric supplier or the service rights accruing to the lines of any electric supplier inside any assigned area, unassigned area-A, or municipality, provided that such electric supplier may extend and furnish service from such line to any other premises which it otherwise has the right to serve;

No portion of a line constructed after March 29, 1973, by an electric supplier inside an unassigned area-B to serve premises which, but for the exception provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, it would not have had the right to serve shall impair or diminish any service rights accruing to the lines of any other electric supplier inside such unassigned area-B, provided that such electric supplier may extend and furnish service from such line to any other premises which it otherwise has the right to serve;

No portion of a line constructed after March 29, 1973, by an electric supplier for the initial sole purpose of furnishing service at wholesale shall acquire any other service rights or impair or diminish the service rights of any assignee electric supplier or the service rights accruing to the lines of any electric supplier, provided that such electric supplier may extend and furnish service from such line to any other premises which it otherwise has the right to serve;

No electric supplier shall, after March 29, 1973, construct its lines to serve new premises except in accordance with sound electric utility standards. If, after a hearing involving the affected electric suppliers and any other interested party, the commission determines that an electric supplier is about to violate, is violating, or has violated such standards so as arbitrarily to preempt areas or arbitrarily to gain service rights for such a line, the commission is authorized and directed:

To order the offending electric supplier to cease and desist such construction or to alter and relocate the same; or

To declare that such line or any offending portion thereof shall not be taken into account in assigning an area or in locating an assigned area boundary or shall not acquire any service rights that would otherwise accrue thereto or impair or diminish any service rights accruing to the lines of any other electric supplier;

Any electric supplier may extend and furnish service to any of its own premises devoted to public service, whether the same shall have already been served by another electric supplier, but no line constructed for such purpose after March 29, 1973, shall acquire any other service right or impair or diminish the service rights of any assignee electric supplier or the service rights accruing to the lines of any electric supplier, provided that such electric supplier may extend and furnish service from such line to other premises which it otherwise has the right to serve;

No line of a secondary supplier constructed prior to March 29, 1973, which on that date is not providing retail service to one or more premises within the limits of the municipality as they exist on that date shall acquire any service rights to provide retail service to any premises located within such municipal limits as they exist on that date.

The time at which an electric supplier, based upon the location or proximity of electric suppliers’ lines as in this part provided for, shall be considered as having the right to extend and furnish, or as being restricted from extending and furnishing, service to new premises shall be the time at which written application for temporary construction or permanent service is made to any electric supplier by the consumer utilizing such premises or the time at which construction of such premises is commenced, whichever first occurs. The location of a premises for temporary construction service shall be deemed to be the same as the location of the premises which shall require permanent service after construction. If temporary construction service is required at one site for the purpose of beginning the construction of premises at two or more sites, this subsection shall not preclude an electric supplier, if chosen by the builder and having the right to serve at least one of the premises to be constructed, from furnishing all of such temporary construction service, notwithstanding the fact that one or more other electric suppliers may have and may exercise the exclusive right thereafter to extend and furnish the permanent service to one or more of the premises being constructed.

Whenever, after March 29, 1973, any new premises requiring service are so sited as to be located partially within an assigned area, an unassigned area-A, or an unassigned area-B and also partially within any other assigned area, unassigned area-A, or unassigned area-B, such premises may be served by that electric supplier chosen by the consumer utilizing such premises from among the electric suppliers which are eligible under this part to extend and furnish such service within any of such areas.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part, if a majority of those voters of a municipality which was not rendering electric service on March 29, 1973, approve, by means of referendum vote, the purchase, construction, extension, operation, and maintenance of an electric distribution system by that municipality, such municipality is granted the right of eminent domain to condemn all of the lines and other facilities of the primary supplier within such municipality and any secondary supplier located within the corporate limits of such municipality and used to serve customers therein at retail. This right shall expire, with respect to each such municipality, one year after the date the results of such referendum are declared unless, before that date, such municipality institutes proceedings to acquire such lines and other facilities under any of the statutory methods provided for the condemnation of private property. Upon a final order of condemnation of such lines and other facilities, such municipality shall become the primary supplier therein, the rights of the former primary supplier and any such secondary suppliers under subsection (b) of this Code section shall cease, and the consumers served thereby within such corporate limits shall be thereafter served by the municipality as the new primary supplier. The transfer of service shall be accomplished as nearly as practicable without interruption of service to the consumers. Electric suppliers are authorized to negotiate the sale and purchase of all or any part of any such lines and other facilities, and upon the transfer of title thereto the rights of the selling supplier under subsection (b) of this Code section shall cease.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 200, § 9.

Law reviews.

For article, “Administrative Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 81 (2001).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2009).

For article, “The Chevron Two-Step in Georgia’s Administrative Law,” see 46 Ga. L. Rev. 871 (2012).

46-3-9.
Limitation on power of electric membership corporations to furnish service within municipalities.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no electric membership corporation shall be authorized or empowered to furnish service inside the corporate limits of any municipality except:

If it is already furnishing service therein on March 29, 1973, or if its lines become annexed, including annexation that may be caused by the merger, consolidation, or any other combination of a then existing municipality and one or more other geographically defined political subdivisions, if the resulting political subdivision constitutes a municipality as defined in Code Section 46-3-3, or if its lines become included in a wholly new municipality, in any of which events the other relevant Code sections of this part shall apply and prevail;

To extend and furnish service initially inside a municipality the population of which at the time of such initial service is 1,500 or less, but not inconsistently with the other Code sections of this part; or

Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2) of this Code section, if the municipality and all electric suppliers then furnishing service inside such municipality or furnishing electric service to the municipality at wholesale so consent.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 200, § 13; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

46-3-10.
Limitation on power of electric suppliers to condemn property of other electric suppliers.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no electric supplier shall be authorized or empowered to exercise the power of eminent domain for the purpose of acquiring any property, whether real or personal, of another electric supplier which property is devoted to the public use in furnishing wholesale or retail electric service if such acquisition would destroy or unduly impair or interfere with the operation or use of such property by such other electric supplier.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 200, § 14.

46-3-11.
Application by electric supplier of discriminatory rates, charges, or service rules or regulations; prohibited acts by electric suppliers generally.

Every electric supplier is prohibited from having or applying any rate, charge, or service rule or regulation which unreasonably discriminates against or in favor of (1) any member of a class of consumers as opposed to any other consumer who is or should be in the same class of consumers for such purposes, or (2) any class of its consumers as opposed to another class of consumers for such purposes, provided that this prohibition shall not apply to any rate, charge, or service rule or regulation relating solely to service rendered by a municipality to consumers whose premises are located within its limits as they existed on March 29, 1973.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every electric supplier is prohibited from, directly or indirectly, by ordinance, law, policy, contract, rate, regulation, or otherwise:

Requiring that a consumer receive retail electric service from such electric supplier as a condition for such consumer to receive from such electric supplier or any other person any goods or other services that are not reasonably related to the furnishing of retail electric service to such consumer’s premises;

Offering a consumer lesser charges or more favorable terms or conditions for retail electric service because of such consumer’s receiving or agreeing to receive from such electric supplier any goods or other services that are not reasonably related to the furnishing of retail electric service to such consumer’s premises;

Imposing higher charges for any goods or other services that are not reasonably related to the furnishing of retail electric service to a consumer’s premises because of such consumer’s failure or refusal to receive retail electric service from that supplier; or

Furnishing retail electric service to any premises which such electric supplier is not entitled to serve under this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 200, § 10.

46-3-12.
Jurisdiction of commission over electric membership corporations.

All electric membership corporations which furnish service in the State of Georgia and all municipalities, whether incorporated by this state or not, which furnish service inside the state shall, in addition to the manner and extent otherwise provided for in this part, be subject to the authority and jurisdiction of the commission in the same manner as electric light and power companies are subject under other laws of the State of Georgia and regulations of the commission pursuant thereto, provided that the rates, charges, and service rules and regulations of electric membership corporations and municipalities shall be filed with the commission and shall be subject to Code Section 46-3-11 but shall not otherwise be fixed by the commission; provided, further, that securities issued by a municipality relating solely to service rendered inside its limits as they existed on March 29, 1973, shall not be subject to regulation by the commission; provided, further, that service rendered by any electric supplier shall be made pursuant to and consistent with its rates, charges, and service rules and regulations then in effect.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 200, § 11.